West Virginia, session 2026, HB5020.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 11A. prohibition of CERTAIN PERSONS on school property and at school sponsored events. §16-11A-1. Prohibiting those listed on the state sex offender database, convicted felons of sexual assault, or persons convicted of abuse of juveniles from entering school property or attending public school activities and events. Without permission of the county superintendent:(a) No person having been found guilty of crimes sufficient to be placed on the state sex offender's database, a convicted felon of sexual assault, or a person convicted of abuse of juveniles shall be permitted to enter school property, attend any public school function, or attend or participate in public school or athletic events in any capacity, regardless of participation by offender's own children.(1) A first violation of this statute shall be a misdemeanor upon first violation, punishable by not more than six months imprisonment; and(2) A second or any other subsequent violation shall constitute a felony punishable by one to five years imprisonment.(b) In the event that a parent teacher conference is required to be conducted with a parent or guardian who is listed on the sex offender database, that conference must be conducted by telephone or virtual meeting.(c) The State Board of Education may promulgate rules in accordance with this article.